dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
aizdzīt/GIB3^5-J po:darbv15t
aizdžinkstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
aizklaiņot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
aizlāčot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
aizlīt/GIB3%8-J po:darbv15t
aizrībināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
aizrūkt/9EB0358J- po:darbv13t
aizšķirt/AIB1^35Jaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
aizšpaktelēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
aizvīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
aizvizuļot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
allaž/= po:apstv
anonimizēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
apdiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
apdziedēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
apēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-* po:darbv11t
apgarotība/S- po:lietv4r
apirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
apklibot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
aplūzt/FDB23578- po:darbv15t
apmēdīt/FDB2357J- po:darb32t
apmīt/09EB%35^Jb+-AaIi po:darbv11t
apravēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
aprīt/AIB0358Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
apsēdošās/-
apsmirdēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
apšļakstīt/FDB2357J- po:darb32t
apvīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
ārpievades/= po:lietv5g
asociēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
astoņgadu/= po:lietv1g
atbraukāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
atdiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
atirt/IB1^35J9- po:darbv14t
atklaudzināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
atklepot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
atplacināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
atrast/HIB%457Jhib$-* po:darbv13t
atriņķot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
atspringt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
atšķirt/AIB1^35bJaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
atvagot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
atvietot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
atvīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
augšup/= po:apstv
baltvācu/= po:lietv1g
bezemisiju/= po:lietv4g
beznodokļa/= po:lietv2g
bezsaistes/= po:lietv5g
bezvārdu/= po:lietv1g
bļaut/8EB135ebJ9(+-j po:darbv14t
braukšus/= po:apstv
caurredzēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
caurvīt/AIB0358Jaib- po:darbv11t
ceturtdien/= po:apstv
cukīni/= po:lietv0i
četrkolonnu/= po:lietv4g
dabasgāzēs/= po:lietv5f
daudzkadru/= po:lietv1g
daudzslāņu/= po:apstv
dehidrēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
dekoltē/= po:lietv0i
divarpus/= po:apstv
divkabeļu/= po:lietv2g
divportu/= po:lietv1g
divzilbju/= po:lietv5g
dugt/HDB237- po:darbv15t
dzīt/GIB3%^5-J po:darbv15t
dzīvināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
ekv./= po:abrev
fu/= po:saiklis
gofrēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
gorillam/= po:lietv4f
guldzēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
ģist/AIB0458J- po:darbv12t
iedegt/8DB035dbJAa+-& po:darbv14t
iediet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
iegropēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
ieirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
iekams/= po:saiklis
ieknaibīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
iemigt/FDB0358J- po:darbv12t
iemīt/09EB%35^Jeb+-*AaIi po:darbv11t
iepatiksies/-
ierīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-*j po:darbv11t
ieslīgt/HDB2358-J po:darbv15t
iespīgot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
ieurdzēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
ievest/FIB0458Jfib)$-* po:darbv11t
iezvīļot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
indigo/= po:lietv0i
irt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
izbeicēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
izdiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
izdūdot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
izgaisināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
izirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
izķengāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
izķīlēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
izmīt/09EB%35^Jb+-AaIi po:darbv11t
izpilēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
izpulgot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
izspaidīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
izšķirt/AIB1^35bJaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
izšļūkāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
izvaļoties/<- po:darbv22a
izvīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
jāatsēžas/=
jānomācas/=
jāsabīstas/=
jebkad/= po:apstv
ka/= po:saiklis
karināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
klanīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
klientservera/= po:lietv2g
krišus/= po:apstv
kustēt/FDB2357Jfdb+&j- po:darbv33t
ķēzīt/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darb23t
labdien/= po:saiklis
libido/= po:lietv0i
līt/GIB3%58-J po:darbv15t
lotēs/= po:lietv5f
māksliniecisks/W- po:īpv1i
marabu/= po:lietv0i
melnplauka/= po:lietv1g
mudināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
nākamnedēļ/= po:apstv
niansēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
nobrist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
nodibināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
nodisputēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
noēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
noirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
nokaist/FDC2357-J po:darbv15t
noknakšķināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
nolūdzas/-
noorientēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
nopogot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
norīt/AIB0358Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
noskurbt/FDB2357-J po:darbv15t
noslēpot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
nošķirt/AIB1^35bJai&bj+!- po:darbv14t
notrenkāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
novest/FIB0458J- po:darbv11t
nozeltīt/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darb23t
nozust/HIB0458J- po:darbv13t
nudien/= po:apstv
pablenzt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
pacenstos/-
padiet/IB^35%JA- po:darbv14t
pagraizīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
paildzināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
pairt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
pakvēpināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
paļumt/FDB2357-J po:darbv15t
pamīt/09EB%35^Jeb+-*AaIi po:darbv11t
paņirgt/8EB035J9- po:darbv14t
pāraulekšot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
pārbīties/-
pārbrist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
pārēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
pārgulšņāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
parikšot/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darbv22t
parīt/AIB0358Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
pārlipt/FDB0357J- po:darbv13t
pārmistrot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
pārmīt/09IB%35^Jb+-AaIi po:darbv11t
pārrast/HIB%457Jhib-* po:darbv13t
pārrunāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
pārspraudīt/FDB2357J- po:darb32t
pārvest/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
pārzārdot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
pasākt/ADB1358Jadb+-& po:darbv11t
pasēs/= po:lietv5f
pašķirt/AIB1^35bJaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
pašņakstināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
patrinkšķināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
pavīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
pažvadzēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
peldviesos/= po:lietv2f
piebrist/AIB0458Jaeb)$-* po:darbv13t po:darbv13t
pieklauvēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
pieklupt/ADB0357J- po:darbv13t
pielīt/GIB3%58-J po:darbv15t
pierēvēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
piespīlēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
piešķirt/AIB1^35Jaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
pievalkāt/HDB1357J- po:darbv21t
pilnpapēžu/= po:lietv2g
portugāliski/= po:apstv
prettrestu/= po:lietv1g
pusdeviņiem/= po:skv
pusvienpadsmitus/= po:skv
raizēties/<- po:darbv24a
raportēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
rast/HIB%457Jhib$-* po:darbv13t
sačiept/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
sadzīt/GIB3%^5-J po:darbv15t
safari/= po:lietv0i
saformatēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
saklaudzēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
salīt/GIB3%58-J po:darbv15t
samundrināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
saniekot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
sasēdušos/-
saskrullēt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv24t
sastrēbt/7DB035dbJA(+-& po:darbv14t
satuvināt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darbv31t
savest/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
sešnedēļu/= po:lietv4g
skandalēt/HDB1357J- po:darbv24t
slīdēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
starpasu/= po:lietv6g
suņa/= po:lietv2f
šņukstēt/FDB2357J- po:darbv33t
šosezon/= po:apstv
tašķīt/HDB1357Jhdb!+&j- po:darb23t
tētos/= po:lietv2f
trīsarpus/= po:skv
tukšrokdžimpiņ/=
uzbrist/AIB0458J- po:darbv13t
uzcienāt/HDB1357J(db!+&j- po:darbv21t
uzirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
uzklepot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
uzkvēpt/FDB2357-J po:darbv15t
uzsēt/7DB135J9- po:darbv14t
uzsmaiļot/HDB1357J- po:darbv22t
uzšķirt/AIB1^35bJaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
uzvalstīt/FDB2357Jfdb@+&j- po:darb32t
vairākvalodu/= po:lietv4g
viencokola/= po:lietv1g
vienmērīgs/WYX- po:īpv1i
vienšūnas/= po:lietv4g
vispirmām/= po:apstv
vīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
zilināt/FDB2357J- po:darbv31t
